Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2916
Service of process.

(1) An agent for service of process appointed by a limited cooperative association or a foreign limited cooperative association is an agent of the limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association for service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association.

(2)(a) If a limited cooperative association or a foreign limited cooperative association has no agent for service of process or the agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served the limited cooperative association may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the limited cooperative association at its principal office. Service shall be perfected under this subsection at the earliest of:

(i) The date the limited cooperative association receives the mail;

(ii) The date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the limited cooperative association; or

(iii) Five days after its deposit in the United States mail as evidenced by the postmark, if mailed postage prepaid and correctly addressed.

(b) This subsection shall not limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a limited cooperative association in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 16.